Rhode Island statutes. Title 17 Elections
Chapter 24 Compelling Performance of Election Duties

17-24-1.
Mandamus by supreme court — Replacement of officer refusing to obey.

Whenever any person upon whom is imposed any duty connected with the calling, warning, or conducting of any town, ward, or district meeting, or with the canvassing of the lists of voters for use at these meetings, or with the counting of the votes cast at the meetings, or the declaring of the result of the votes, fails, neglects, or refuses to perform his or her duty within the time specified by law for its performance, the supreme court shall immediately, upon the petition of any citizen of the city or town where the failure, neglect, or refusal occurred, issue its writ of mandamus ordering the person failing, neglecting, or refusing to perform the duties in question within twenty-four (24) hours from the time of the issuance of the writ; and if the failure, neglect, or refusal continues beyond the twenty-four (24) hours specified in the writ, the court shall immediately appoint some suitable person to at once perform the duties, and the person refusing to obey the writ of mandamus shall, in addition to the penalties by law for the failure, neglect, or refusal to perform his or her duties, be liable to those further penalties for contempt of court that the court may impose for failure to obey the writ.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 14, § 5; C.P.A. 1905, § 1226; G.L. 1909, ch. 20, § 5; G.L. 1923, ch. 19, § 5; G.L. 1938, ch. 326, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

17-24-1

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1.

17-24-2.
Performance of duties by supreme court appointee.

The person appointed by the court, as provided in §

17-24-1

, shall immediately proceed to perform the duties devolved upon him or her by the court, and the acts done by him or her in pursuance of his or her appointment shall be as effectual and valid in all respects as if the acts had been done and performed by the person failing, neglecting, or refusing, at the time and in the manner provided by law.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 14, § 6; G.L. 1909, ch. 20, § 6; G.L. 1923, ch. 19, § 6; G.L. 1938, ch. 326, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

17-24-2

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1.

17-24-3.
Powers of court appointee — Hindering performance.

The person appointed by the court, as provided in §

17-24-1

, shall be deemed an officer of the court and shall have full and free access to all records and papers necessary to enable him or her to perform the duties devolved upon him or her by the court, and any person interfering with or in any way hindering his or her discharge of his or her duties shall be liable to those penalties that may be prescribed by the court for contempt, and it shall be the duty of the sheriffs of the several counties and their deputies to see that the provisions of this chapter are enforced within their respective counties.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 14, § 7; G.L. 1909, ch. 20, § 7; G.L. 1923, ch. 19, § 7; G.L. 1938, ch. 326, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

17-24-3

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1.